Utah statutes.
63M-7-525.   Purpose -- Not entitlement program.
(1)  The purpose of the Office of Crime Victim Reparations is to assist
victims of criminally injurious conduct who may be eligible for assistance
from the Crime Victim Reparations Fund.  Reparation to a victim is limited to
the monies available in the fund.
(2)  This program is not an entitlement program.  Awards may be limited or
denied as determined appropriate by the board.  Failure to grant an award does
not create a cause of action against the Office of Crime Victim Reparations,
the state, or any of its subdivisions.  There is no right to judicial review
over the decision whether or not to grant an award.
(3)  A cause of action based on a failure to give or receive the notice
required by this chapter does not accrue to any person against the state, any
of its agencies or local subdivisions, any of their law enforcement officers
or other agents or employees, or any health care or medical provider or its
agents or employees.  The failure does not affect or alter any requirement for
filing or payment of a claim.
